Illinois, session 104th, HB3083.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois TRUST Act is amended by changing 5Sections 10, 15, 25, and 30 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 805/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act: 8    "Citizenship or immigration status" means all matters 9regarding citizenship of the United States or any other 10country or the authority to reside in or otherwise be present 11in the United States.12    "Civil immigration warrant" means any document that is not 13approved or ordered by a judge that can form the basis for an 14individual's arrest or detention for a civil immigration 15enforcement purpose. "Civil immigration warrant" includes Form 16I-200 "Warrant for the Arrest of Alien", Form I-203 "Order to 17Detain or Release Alien", Form I-205 "Warrant of 18Removal/Deportation", Form I-286 "Notice of Custody 19Determination", any predecessor or successor form, and all 20warrants, hits, or requests contained in the "Immigration 21Violator File" of the FBI's National Crime Information Center 22(NCIC) database. "Civil immigration warrant" does not include 23any criminal warrant.  HB3083- 2 -LRB104 11475 BDA 21564 b1    "Contact information" means home address, work address, 2telephone number, electronic mail address, social media 3information, or any other personal identifying information 4that could be used as a means to contact an individual.5    "Immigration agent" means an agent of federal Immigration 6and Customs Enforcement, federal Customs and Border 7Protection, or any similar or successor agency. 8    "Immigration detainer" means a request to a State or local 9law enforcement agency to provide notice of release or 10maintain custody of an individual based on an alleged 11violation of a civil immigration law, including detainers 12issued under Sections 1226 or 1357 of Title 8 of the United 13States Code or 287.7 or 236.1 of Title 8 of the Code of Federal 14Regulations. "Immigration detainer" includes Form I-247A 15"Immigration Detainer – Notice of Action" and any predecessor 16or successor form.17    "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of the State or 18of a unit of local government charged with enforcement of 19State, county, or municipal laws or with managing custody of 20detained persons in the State.21    "Law enforcement official" means any individual with the 22power to arrest or detain individuals, including law 23enforcement officers, corrections officers, and others 24employed or designated by a law enforcement agency. "Law 25enforcement official" includes any probation officer. 26    "School" means any public elementary or secondary school,   HB3083- 3 -LRB104 11475 BDA 21564 b1public community college, public college, or public State 2university.3(Source: P.A. 102-234, eff. 8-2-21; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 4    (5 ILCS 805/15)5    Sec. 15. Prohibition on enforcing federal civil 6immigration laws. 7    (a) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 8shall not detain or continue to detain any individual solely 9on the basis of any immigration detainer or civil immigration 10warrant or otherwise comply with an immigration detainer or 11civil immigration warrant.12    (b) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 13shall not stop, arrest, search, detain, or continue to detain 14a person solely based on an individual's citizenship or 15immigration status.16    (c) (Blank).17    (d) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 18acting in good faith in compliance with this Section who 19releases a person subject to an immigration detainer or civil 20immigration warrant shall have immunity from any civil or 21criminal liability that might otherwise occur as a result of 22making the release, with the exception of willful or wanton 23misconduct.24    (e) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 25may not inquire about or investigate the citizenship or   HB3083- 4 -LRB104 11475 BDA 21564 b1immigration status or place of birth of any individual in the 2agency or official's custody or who has otherwise been stopped 3or detained by the agency or official. Nothing in this 4subsection shall be construed to limit the ability of a law 5enforcement agency or law enforcement official, pursuant to 6State or federal law, to notify a person in the law enforcement 7agency's custody about that person's right to communicate with 8consular officers from that person's country of nationality, 9or facilitate such communication, in accordance with the 10Vienna Convention on Consular Relations or other bilateral 11agreements. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 12limit the ability of a law enforcement agency or law 13enforcement official to request evidence of citizenship or 14immigration status pursuant to the Firearm Owners 15Identification Card Act, the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, 16Article 24 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or 18 United States 17Code Sections 921 through 931.18    (f) Unless otherwise limited by federal law, a law 19enforcement agency or law enforcement official may not deny 20services, benefits, privileges, or opportunities to an 21individual in custody or under probation status, including, 22but not limited to, eligibility for or placement in a lower 23custody classification, educational, rehabilitative, or 24diversionary programs, on the basis of the individual's 25citizenship or immigration status, the issuance of an 26immigration detainer or civil immigration warrant against the   HB3083- 5 -LRB104 11475 BDA 21564 b1individual, or the individual being in immigration removal 2proceedings.3    (g)(1) No law enforcement agency, law enforcement 4official, or any unit of State or local government may enter 5into or renew any contract, intergovernmental service 6agreement, or any other agreement to house or detain 7individuals for federal civil immigration violations.8    (2) Any law enforcement agency, law enforcement official, 9or unit of State or local government with an existing 10contract, intergovernmental agreement, or other agreement, 11whether in whole or in part, that is utilized to house or 12detain individuals for civil immigration violations shall 13exercise the termination provision in the agreement as applied 14to housing or detaining individuals for civil immigration 15violations no later than January 1, 2022.16    (h) Unless presented with a federal criminal warrant, or 17otherwise required by federal law, a law enforcement agency, 18law enforcement or official, school, or school employee may 19not:20        (1) participate, support, or assist in any capacity 21    with an immigration agent's enforcement operations, 22    including any collateral assistance such as coordinating 23    an arrest in a courthouse or other public facility, 24    providing use of any equipment, transporting any 25    individuals, or establishing a security or traffic 26    perimeter surrounding such operations, or any other   HB3083- 6 -LRB104 11475 BDA 21564 b1    on-site support;2        (2) give any immigration agent access, including by 3    telephone, to any individual who is in that agency's 4    custody;5        (3) transfer any person into an immigration agent's 6    custody;7        (4) permit immigration agents use of agency facilities 8    or equipment, including any agency electronic databases 9    not available to the public, for investigative interviews 10    or other investigative or immigration enforcement purpose;11        (5) enter into or maintain any agreement regarding 12    direct access to any electronic database or other 13    data-sharing platform maintained by any law enforcement 14    agency, or otherwise provide such direct access to the 15    U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, United States 16    Customs and Border Protection or any other federal entity 17    enforcing civil immigration violations;18        (6) provide information in response to any immigration 19    agent's inquiry or request for information regarding any 20    individual in the agency's custody; or21        (7) provide to any immigration agent information not 22    otherwise available to the public relating to an 23    individual's release or contact information, or otherwise 24    facilitate for an immigration agent to apprehend or 25    question an individual for immigration enforcement.26    (i) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a law   HB3083- 7 -LRB104 11475 BDA 21564 b1enforcement official from otherwise executing that official's 2duties in investigating violations of criminal law and 3cooperating in such investigations with federal and other law 4enforcement agencies (including criminal investigations 5conducted by federal Homeland Security Investigations (HSI)) 6in order to ensure public safety. 7(Source: P.A. 102-234, eff. 8-2-21; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 8    (5 ILCS 805/25)9    Sec. 25. Reporting requirements.10    (a) In order to ensure compliance with this Act, starting 11on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 12General Assembly, law enforcement agencies shall submit a 13report annually to the Attorney General. Starting on the 14effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 15Assembly, schools shall also submit a report annually to the 16Attorney General. This report shall include:17        (1) Any requests from the United States Department of 18    Homeland Security, including, but not limited to, 19    Immigration and Customs and Enforcement, with respect to 20    participation, support, or assistance in any immigration 21    agent's civil enforcement operation, and any documentation 22    regarding how the request was addressed, provided that if 23    an agency does not receive any such requests during a 24    reporting period, the agency shall certify and report that 25    it received no such requests;  HB3083- 8 -LRB104 11475 BDA 21564 b1        (2) All immigration detainers or civil immigration 2    warrants received by the law enforcement agency, provided 3    that if an agency does not receive any such detainers or 4    warrants during a reporting period, the agency shall 5    certify and report that it received no such detainers or 6    warrants. The reports shall include:7            (A) the date when the immigration detainer or 8        civil immigration warrant was received;9            (B) the date and time the individual subject to 10        the immigration detainer or civil immigration warrant 11        posted criminal bail, if applicable;12            (C) whether the individual subject to the 13        immigration detainer or civil immigration warrant was 14        released or transferred;15            (D) the date and time the individual was released 16        or transferred; and17            (E) if the individual is transferred, to which 18        governmental agency's custody.19    (b) Law enforcement agencies shall not include names or 20other personally identifying information in any reports 21required under this Section. 22(Source: P.A. 102-234, eff. 8-2-21.) 23    (5 ILCS 805/30)24    Sec. 30. Attorney General enforcement provisions. In order 25to ensure compliance with this Act:  HB3083- 9 -LRB104 11475 BDA 21564 b1        (a) The Attorney General shall have authority to 2    conduct investigations into violations of this Act. The 3    Attorney General may: (1) require a law enforcement 4    agency, law enforcement official, school, school employee, 5    or any other person or entity to file a statement or report 6    in writing under oath or otherwise, as to all information 7    the Attorney General may consider necessary; (2) examine 8    under oath any law enforcement official, school employee, 9    or any other person alleged to have participated in or 10    with knowledge of the alleged violation; or (3) issue 11    subpoenas, obtain records, conduct hearings, or take any 12    other actions in aid of any investigation. In the event a 13    law enforcement agency, law enforcement official, school, 14    school employee, or other person or entity fails to 15    comply, in whole or in part, with a subpoena or other 16    investigative request issued pursuant to this paragraph, 17    the Attorney General may compel compliance through an 18    action in the circuit court.19        (b) Upon his or her own information or upon the 20    complaint of any person, the Attorney General may maintain 21    an action for declaratory, injunctive or any other 22    equitable relief in the circuit court against any law 23    enforcement agency, law enforcement official, or other 24    person or entity who violates any provision of this Act. 25    These remedies are in addition to, and not in substitution 26    for, other available remedies.  HB3083- 10 -LRB104 11475 BDA 21564 b1(Source: P.A. 102-234, eff. 8-2-21.)